Utah statutes.
59-2-923.   Expenditures of money prior to adoption of budget or tax rate.
A taxing entity may, before the taxing entity adopts a final annual budget or
a tax rate, expend moneys on the basis of the taxing entity's:
(1)  tentative budget after adoption of the tentative budget; or
(2)  prior year's adopted final budget as amended, which shall be readopted by
resolution at a meeting of the taxing entity's governing body.
